Florida, session 2026, SB1118.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âPresent subsection (5) of section 112.231, 15 Florida Statutes, as created by SB 484 or similar legislation, 16 2026 Regular Session, is redesignated as subsection (6), and a 17 new subsection (5) is added to that section, to read: 18 112.231âData center nondisclosure agreements; 19 confidentiality.â 20 (5)(a)âIf a person, as defined in 1.01(3), requests in 21 writing that a county or municipality maintain the 22 confidentiality of information that concerns the plans, 23 intentions, or interests of such person to locate a data center 24 within the jurisdiction of the county or municipality, any 25 portion of a public record held by a county or municipality 26 which contains such information is confidential and exempt from 27 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. The 28 request must be made during the timeframe in which the person 29 plans, intends, or is interested in locating the data center and 30 before any formal application is filed with the county or 31 municipality. The information is confidential and exempt for 12 32 months after the date a county or municipality receives a 33 request for confidentiality or until the person waives 34 confidentiality or the information is otherwise disclosed. 35 However, the county or municipality must disclose that the 36 project is a data center. This paragraph applies to officers and 37 public employees of the county or municipality and any other 38 public or private agency, person, partnership, corporation, or 39 business entity acting on behalf of the county or municipality. 40 (b)âThe information requested pursuant to paragraph (a) may 41 be disclosed to an agency with decision-making or regulatory 42 responsibility regarding the data center, including, but not 43 limited to, regulation of the location, construction, or 44 operations. 45 (c)1.âA personâs proprietary confidential business 46 information related to a data center and held by an agency is 47 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 48 of the State Constitution, until such information is otherwise 49 publicly available or is no longer treated by the proprietor as 50 proprietary confidential business information. 51 2.âThe term âproprietary confidential business informationâ 52 means information that is owned or controlled by the person 53 requesting confidentiality under this section; that is intended 54 to be and is treated by the person as private in that the 55 disclosure of the information would cause harm to the business 56 operations of the person; and that has not been disclosed 57 pursuant to a statutory provision or an order of a court or 58 administrative body. Proprietary confidential business 59 information includes all of the following: 60 a.âBusiness plans. 61 b.âInternal auditing controls and reports of internal 62 auditors. 63 c.âReports of external auditors for privately held 64 companies. 65 d.âSecurity measures, systems, or procedures. 66 e.âInformation relating to competitive interests, the 67 disclosure of which would impair the competitive business of the 68 provider of the information. 69 (d)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 70 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 71 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 72 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 73 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 74 necessity to provide confidentiality for a period of time for 75 certain information concerning persons locating a data center in 76 this state which is contained in records of such persons 77 conducting business or attempting to conduct business with a 78 county or municipality in this state. The disclosure of 79 information such as plans for locating proprietary confidential 80 business information, or other business activities related to 81 the data center could injure a person in the marketplace by 82 providing competitors with detailed insights into the strategic 83 plans of the person or with confidential personnel information, 84 thereby diminishing the advantage that the person maintains over 85 those that do not possess such information. Without these 86 exemptions, persons whose records generally are not required to 87 be open to the public might refrain from locating a data center 88 in this state and instead choose to conduct business activities 89 outside of this state, which would deprive the state and the 90 public of the potential economic benefits associated with 91 business activities in this state. The harm to persons caused by 92 the public disclosure of such information outweighs the public 93 benefits derived from the release of the information. 94 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 95 SB 484 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 96 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 97 thereof and becomes a law.